Hawaii statutes.
§660-20 Body to be produced, except when.
The person making the return to a writ of habeas corpus shall bring the body of
the person, if in the custody or power of the person making the return, or
under the restraint or control of the person making the return, according to
the command in the writ, unless prevented by the sickness or infirmity of the
person. This shall not prevent the person making the return, if a private
person, from demanding in advance actual necessary expenses of travel and
transportation. [L 1870, c 32, §15; RL 1925, §2743; RL 1935, §4328; RL 1945,
§10369; RL 1955, §239-20; HRS §660-20; am L 1972, c 90, §5(m); am L 2016, c 55,
§38]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next